Georgia, session 2025_26, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes" means all ad valorem taxes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City
of Cartersville independent school district in this state, except for any ad valorem taxes
levied to pay interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Adjusted base year assessed value" means the sum of:
(A) The previous adjusted base year assessed value;
S. B. 77
- 1 -

LC 44 3022S (SCS)
(B) An amount equal to the difference between the current year assessed value of the
homestead and the base year assessed value of the homestead, provided that such amount
shall not exceed the total of the previous adjusted base year assessed value of the
homestead multiplied by the inflation rate for the prior year; and
(C) The value of any substantial property change, provided that no such value added
improvements to the homestead shall be duplicated as to the same addition or
improvement.
(3) "Base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to an exemption under this section which is first granted to a person on
such person's homestead for the 2026 taxable year, the assessed value for taxable year
2024, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section
48-5-311, of the homestead; or
(B) In all other cases, the assessed value, including any final determination of value on
appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311, of the homestead from the taxable year
immediately preceding the taxable year in which the exemption under this section is first
granted to the applicant.
(4) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(5) "Inflation rate" means the annual inflationary index rate as determined for a given year
by the Bartow County tax commissioner in accordance with subsection (f) of this section.
(6) "Previous adjusted base year assessed value" means:
(A) With respect to the year for which the exemption under this section is first granted
to a person on such person's homestead, the base year assessed value; or
(B) In all other cases, the adjusted base year assessed value of the homestead as
calculated in the taxable year immediately preceding the current year, including any final
determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311.
S. B. 77
- 2 -

LC 44 3022S (SCS)
(7) "Substantial property change" means any increase or decrease in the assessed value of
a homestead derived from additions or improvements to, or the removal of real property
from, the homestead which occurred after the year in which the base year assessed value
is determined for the homestead. The assessed value of the substantial property changes
shall be established following any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code
Section 48-5-311.
(b)(1) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, each resident of the City of
Cartersville independent school district is granted an exemption on that person's homestead
from ad valorem taxes in an amount equal to the amount by which the current year assessed
value of that homestead, including any final determination of value on appeal pursuant to
Code Section 48-5-311, exceeds its previous adjusted base year assessed value.
(2) Except as provided for in subsection (c) of this section, no exemption provided for in
this subsection shall transfer to any subsequent owner of the property, and the assessed
value of the property shall be as provided by law.
(c) No person shall receive the exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section unless
such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner of Bartow
County as will enable the tax commissioner to make a determination regarding the initial and
continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption; provided, however, that any person
who had previously applied for a homestead exemption, was allowed such homestead
exemption for the 2025 tax year, and remains eligible for a homestead exemption for that
same homestead property in the 2026 tax year shall be automatically allowed the exemption
granted under subsection (b) of this section for that homestead without further application.
The tax commissioner shall provide application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has filed the proper application as
S. B. 77
- 3 -

LC 44 3022S (SCS)
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b)
of this section to notify the tax commissioner of Bartow County in the event that such person
for any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e)(1) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect
any state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, county school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes, or municipal ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the homestead
exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu
of any other homestead exemption applicable to ad valorem taxes.
(3) The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not be applied
in addition to any other base year value homestead exemption provided by law with respect
to the City of Cartersville independent school district. In any such event, the Bartow
County tax commissioner shall apply only the base year value homestead exemption that
is larger or more beneficial for the taxpayer with respect to the City of Cartersville
independent school district.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the Bartow County tax commissioner shall promulgate
a standardized method for determining annual inflationary index rates which reflect the
effects of inflation and deflation on the cost of living for residents of Bartow County for a
given calendar year. Such method may utilize the Consumer Price Index as reported by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or any other similar
index established by the federal government if the Bartow County tax commissioner
determines that such federal index fairly reflects the effects of inflation and deflation on
residents of the City of Cartersville independent school district.
S. B. 77
- 4 -

LC 44 3022S (SCS)
(g) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
100 In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
101 of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
102 vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
103 SECTION 3.
104 The election superintendent of Bartow County shall call and conduct an election as provided
105 in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Bartow County
106 school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that
107 election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of 2025 and shall issue the
108 call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall
109 cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
110 immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Bartow County. The ballot
111 shall have written or printed thereon the words:
112 "( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
113 Bartow County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in
114 ( ) NO an amount equal to the amount by which the current year assessed value of
115 a homestead exceeds the adjusted base year assessed value, including any
116 final determination of value on appeal pursuant to Code Section 48-5-311
117 of the O.C.G.A., as amended, of such homestead?"
118 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
119 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
120 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
121 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
S. B. 77
- 5 -

LC 44 3022S (SCS)
122 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
123 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
124 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Bartow County. It shall be
125 the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
126 provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
127 intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
128 section, any elector of the Bartow County school district may apply for a writ of mandamus
129 to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the
130 court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
131 fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such
132 election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
133 elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
134 SECTION 4.
135 Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
136 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
137 SECTION 5.
138 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 77
- 6 -